New Jersey, session 221, S387.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A carrier which offers a managed care plan shall not deny a clinical laboratory the right to participate as a provider in the carrier's provider network under the same terms and conditions currently applicable to all other participating clinical laboratories if the health benefits plan provides coverage for laboratory services provided by clinical laboratories and the laboratory is licensed pursuant to R.S.45:9-42.26 et seq. and accepts the terms and conditions of the contract. 2.    The Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month following enactment.